Washington statutes.
RCW 15.51.060

Violation or threatened violation of chapter—Action to enjoin.

The director or any grower or processor of a Brassica seed crop grown within a Brassica seed production district may bring an action to enjoin the violation or threatened violation of any provision of this chapter or its rules, or any Brassica production agreement entered into by an applicant and the director, in the superior court of Thurston county or the county in which the violation or threatened violation occurs or is about to occur.

[ 2007 c 181 s 6.]